North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 10. Law Enforcement and Confinement Facilities.

Part 1. Law Enforcement.

§ 153A-211.
Training and development programs for law enforcement.

A county may plan and execute training and development programs for law-enforcement agencies, and for that purpose may:

Contract with other counties, cities, and the State and federal governments and their agencies;

Accept, receive, and disburse funds, grants, and services;

Pursuant to the procedures and provisions of Chapter 160A, Article 20, Part 1, create joint agencies to act for and on behalf of the participating counties and cities;

Apply for, receive, administer, and expend federal grant funds;

Appropriate funds not otherwise limited as to use by law.

History.

1969, c. 1145, s. 2; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Onslow: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 895.

Cross References.

As to disposition of retired service animals, see

G.S. 20-187.4

.

§ 153A-212.
Cooperation in law-enforcement matters.

A county may cooperate with the State and other local governments in law-enforcement matters, as permitted by

G.S. 160A-283

(joint auxiliary police), by

G.S. 160A-288

(emergency aid),

G.S. 160A-288

.1 (assistance by State law-enforcement officers), and by Chapter 160A, Article 20, Part 1.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1979, c. 639, s. 2.

§ 153A-212.1.
Resources to protect the public.

Subject to the requirements of

G.S. 7A-41

, 7A-44.1, 7A-64, 7A-102, 7A-133, and 7A-498.7, a county may appropriate funds under contract with the State for the provision of services for the speedy disposition of cases involving drug offenses, domestic violence, or other offenses involving threats to public safety. Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to make any appropriation to implement the provisions of this section. Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts or the Office of Indigent Defense Services to maintain positions or services initially provided for under this section.

History.

1999-237, s. 17.17(b); 2000-67, s. 15.4(e); 2001-424, s. 22.11(e).

§ 153A-212.2.
Neighborhood crime watch programs.

A county may establish neighborhood crime watch programs within the county to encourage residents and business owners to promote citizen involvement in securing homes, businesses, and personal property against criminal activity and to report suspicious activities to law enforcement officials.

History.

2006-181, s. 1.

§§ 153A-212.3,
153A-212.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 153A-212.5.

Expired pursuant to Session Laws 2018-113, s. 15.1(c), effective October 1, 2018.

History.

2018-113, s. 15.1(a).

§§ 153A-213 through 153A-215.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Local Confinement Facilities.

§ 153A-216.
Legislative policy.

The policy of the General Assembly with respect to local confinement facilities is:

Local confinement facilities should provide secure custody of persons confined therein in order to protect the community and should be operated so as to protect the health and welfare of prisoners and provide for their humane treatment.

Minimum statewide standards should be provided to guide and assist local governments in planning, constructing, and maintaining confinement facilities and in developing programs that provide for humane treatment of prisoners and contribute to the rehabilitation of offenders.

The State should provide services to local governments to help improve the quality of administration and local confinement facilities. These services should include inspection, consultation, technical assistance, and other appropriate services.

Adequate qualifications and training of the personnel of local confinement facilities are essential to improving the quality of these facilities. The State shall establish entry level employment standards for jailers and supervisory and administrative personnel of local confinement facilities to include training as a condition of employment in a local confinement facility pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 17C and Chapter 17E and the rules promulgated thereunder.

History.

1967, c. 581, s. 2; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1983, c. 745, s. 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For note as to sheriff’s liability for prisoner suicide, in light of Helmly v. Bebber, 77 N.C. App. 275, 335 S.E.2d 182 (1985), see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1520 (1986).

§ 153A-217.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise clearly required by the context, the words and phrases defined in this section have the meanings indicated when used in this Part:

“Commission” means the Social Services Commission.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

“Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

“Governing body” means the governing body of a county or city or the policy-making body for a district or regional confinement facility.

“Local confinement facility” includes a county or city jail, a local lockup, a regional or district jail, a juvenile detention facility, a detention facility for adults operated by a local government, and any other facility operated by a local government for confinement of persons awaiting trial or serving sentences except that it shall not include a county satellite jail/work release unit governed by Part 3 of Article 10 of Chapter 153A.

“Prisoner” includes any person, adult or juvenile, confined or detained in a confinement facility.

“Unit,” “unit of local government,” or “local government” means a county or city.

History.

1967, c. 581, s. 2; 1969, c. 981, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 822, s. 1; 1987, c. 207, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(cc).

§ 153A-218.
County confinement facilities. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

A county may establish, acquire, erect, repair, maintain, and operate local confinement facilities and may for these purposes appropriate funds not otherwise limited as to use by law. Subject to the holdover provisions in

G.S. 7B-2204

, no person under the age of 18 may be held in a county confinement facility unless there is an agreement between the county confinement facility and the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice allowing the housing of persons under the age of 18 at the facility or a portion of the facility that has been approved as a juvenile detention facility by the Juvenile Justice Section. A juvenile detention facility may be located in the same facility as a county jail provided that the juvenile detention facility meets the requirements of this Article and G.S. 147-33.40.

History.

1868, c. 20, s. 8; Code, s. 707; Rev., s. 1318; 1915, c. 140; C.S., s. 1297; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 4(dd); 2020-83, s. 8(n).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-218

.

Cross References.

As to exception for contracts for the purchase of food and supplies for county detention facilities by the sheriffs of certain counties, see

G.S. 143-131.1

.

§ 153A-218.
County confinement facilities. [Effective January 1, 2023]

A county may establish, acquire, erect, repair, maintain, and operate local confinement facilities and may for these purposes appropriate funds not otherwise limited as to use by law. Subject to the holdover provisions in

G.S. 7B-2204

, no person under the age of 18 may be held in a county confinement facility unless there is an agreement between the county confinement facility and the Division of Juvenile Justice allowing the housing of persons under the age of 18 at the facility or a portion of the facility that has been approved as a juvenile detention facility by the Division of Juvenile Justice. A juvenile detention facility may be located in the same facility as a county jail provided that the juvenile detention facility meets the requirements of this Article and G.S. 147-33.40.

History.

1868, c. 20, s. 8; Code, s. 707; Rev., s. 1318; 1915, c. 140; C.S., s. 1297; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 4(dd); 2020-83, s. 8(n); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(pppp).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-218

.

Cross References.

As to exception for contracts for the purchase of food and supplies for county detention facilities by the sheriffs of certain counties, see

G.S. 143-131.1

.

§ 153A-219.
District confinement facilities.

Two or more units of local government may enter into and carry out an agreement to establish, finance, and operate a district confinement facility. The units may construct such a facility or may designate an existing facility as a district confinement facility. In addition, two or more units of local government may enter into and carry out agreements under which one unit may use the local confinement facility owned and operated by another. In exercising the powers granted by this section, the units shall proceed according to the procedures and provisions of Chapter 160A, Article 20, Part 1.

If a district confinement facility is established, the units involved shall provide for a jail administrator for the facility. The administrator need not be the sheriff or any other official of a participating unit. The administrator and the other custodial personnel of a district confinement facility have the authority of law-enforcement officers for the purposes of receiving, maintaining custody of, and transporting prisoners.

If a district confinement facility is established, or if one unit contracts to use the local confinement facility of another, the law-enforcement officers of the contracting units and the custodial personnel of the facility may transport prisoners to and from the facility.

The Department shall provide technical and other assistance to units wishing to exercise any of the powers granted by this section.

History.

1933, c. 201; 1967, c. 581, s. 2; 1969, c. 743; 1971, c. 341, s. 1; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Camden, Pasquotank and Perquimans: 1991, c. 371; Albemarle District Jail in Elizabeth City: 1991, c. 371.

§ 153A-220.
Jail and detention services.

The Commission has policy responsibility for providing and coordinating State services to local government with respect to local confinement facilities. The Department shall:

Consult with and provide technical assistance to units of local government with respect to local confinement facilities.

Develop minimum standards for the construction and operation of local confinement facilities.

Visit and inspect local confinement facilities; advise the sheriff, jailer, governing board, and other appropriate officials as to deficiencies and recommend improvements; and submit written reports on the inspections to appropriate local officials.

Review and approve plans for the construction and major modification of local confinement facilities.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 745, s. 5.

Perform any other duties that may be necessary to carry out the State’s responsibilities concerning local confinement facilities.

History.

1967, c. 581, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 822, s. 1; 1983, c. 745, s. 5.

§ 153A-221.
Minimum standards. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary shall develop and publish minimum standards for the operation of local confinement facilities and may from time to time develop and publish amendments to the standards. The standards shall be developed with a view to providing secure custody of prisoners and to protecting their health and welfare and providing for their humane treatment. The standards shall provide for all of the following:

Secure and safe physical facilities.

Jail design.

Adequacy of space per prisoner.

Heat, light, and ventilation.

Supervision of prisoners.

Personal hygiene and comfort of prisoners.

Medical care for prisoners, including mental health, behavioral health, intellectual and other developmental disability, and substance abuse services.

Sanitation.

Food allowances, food preparation, and food handling.

Any other provisions that may be necessary for the safekeeping, privacy, care, protection, and welfare of prisoners.

In developing the standards and any amendments thereto, the Secretary shall consult with organizations representing local government and local law enforcement, including the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, the North Carolina League of Municipalities, the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, and the North Carolina Police Executives’ Association. The Secretary shall also consult with interested State departments and agencies, including the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Insurance, and the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission, and the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission.

Before the standards or any amendments thereto may become effective, they must be approved by the Commission and the Governor. Upon becoming effective, they have the force and effect of law.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, each dormitory in a county detention facility may house up to 64 inmates as long as the dormitory provides all of the following:

A minimum floor space of 70 square feet per inmate, including both the sleeping and dayroom areas.

One shower per eight inmates, one toilet per eight inmates, one sink with a security mirror per eight inmates, and one water fountain.

A telephone jack or other telephone arrangement provided within the dormitory.

Space designed to allow a variety of activities.

Sufficient seating and tables for all inmates.

A way for officers to observe the entire area from the entrance.

A local confinement facility shall be subject to the requirements of Part 2B of Article 10 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes.

History.

1967, c. 581, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, ss. 128, 133, 138; c. 822, s. 1; 1983, c. 745, s. 6; c. 768, s. 20; 1991, c. 237, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2008-194, s. 10(a), (b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2011-324, s. 1; 2014-22, s. 1; 2017-186, s. 2(eeeeeeeee); 2019-76, s. 30; 2021-143, s. 3(b).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-221

.

Cross References.

As to detention of juveniles in holdover facilities meeting the minimum standards of this section where no juvenile detention home is available, see

G.S. 7B-505

, 7B-1905.

As to exception for contracts for the purchase of food and supplies for county detention facilities by the sheriffs of certain counties, see

G.S. 143-131.1

.

Use of Closed Facilites.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 16C.1(a), (b), provides: “(a) In conjunction with the closing of prison facilities, youth detention centers, and youth development centers, the Department of Public Safety shall consult with the county or municipality in which the facility is located, with elected State and local officials, and with State and federal agencies about the possibility of converting that facility to other use. The Department may also consult with any private for-profit or nonprofit firm about the possibility of converting the facility to other use. In developing a proposal for future use of each facility, the Department shall give priority to converting the facility to other criminal justice use. Consistent with existing law and the future needs of the Department of Public Safety, the State may provide for the transfer or the lease of any of these facilities to counties, municipalities, State agencies, federal agencies, or private firms wishing to convert them to other use.
G.S. 146-29.1(f) through (g) shall not apply to a transfer made pursuant to this section. The Department of Public Safety may also consider converting some of the facilities recommended for closing from one security custody level to another, where that conversion would be cost-effective. A prison unit under lease to a county pursuant to the provisions of this section for use as a jail is exempt for the period of the lease from any of the minimum standards adopted by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

for the housing of adult prisoners that would subject the unit to greater standards than those required of a unit of the State prison system.

“(b) The Department may convert closed facilities for the following purposes:

“(1) Training needs.

“(2) Behavior modification facilities.

“(3) Transitional housing.

“Sixty days prior to converting facilities to these purposes, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety. The report shall include the justification for the conversion, operational requirements for the facility, and available resources for staffing and operating the facility. If the proposed facility will require additional funding in the future, the report shall provide a five-year projection of those funding needs.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2003-284, s. 16.5, Session Laws
2005-276, s. 17.5, Session Laws
2007-323, s. 17.7, Session Laws
2009-451, s. 19.4(a) and (b), Session Laws
2011-145, s. 18.3, Session Laws
2013-360, s. 16A.3, as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 16C.10, and Session Laws
2015-241, s. 16C.3.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 16A.3, as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 16C.10, provides: “In conjunction with the closing of prison facilities, youth detention centers, and youth development centers, the Department of Public Safety shall consult with the county or municipality in which the facility is located, with the elected State and local officials, and with State and federal agencies about the possibility of converting that facility to other use. The Department may also consult with any private for-profit or nonprofit firm about the possibility of converting the facility to other use. In developing a proposal for future use of each facility, the Department shall give priority to converting the facility to other criminal justice use. Consistent with existing law and the future needs of the Department of Public Safety, the State may provide for the transfer or the lease of any of these facilities to counties, municipalities, State agencies, federal agencies, or private firms wishing to convert them to other use. The Department of Public Safety may also consider converting some of the facilities recommended for closing from one security custody level to another, where that conversion would be cost-effective. A prison unit under lease to a county pursuant to the provisions of this section for use as a jail is exempt for the period of the lease from any of the minimum standards adopted by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

for the housing of adult prisoners that would subject the unit to greater standards than those required of a unit of the State prison system.

“In addition, the Department of Public Safety may use available funds to reopen and convert closed facilities for use as treatment and behavior modification facilities for offenders serving a period of confinement in response to violation pursuant to
G.S. 15A-1344(d2).”

§ 153A-221.
Minimum standards. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary shall develop and publish minimum standards for the operation of local confinement facilities and may from time to time develop and publish amendments to the standards. The standards shall be developed with a view to providing secure custody of prisoners and to protecting their health and welfare and providing for their humane treatment. The standards shall provide for all of the following:

Secure and safe physical facilities.

Jail design.

Adequacy of space per prisoner.

Heat, light, and ventilation.

Supervision of prisoners.

Personal hygiene and comfort of prisoners.

Medical care for prisoners, including mental health, behavioral health, intellectual and other developmental disability, and substance abuse services.

Sanitation.

Food allowances, food preparation, and food handling.

Any other provisions that may be necessary for the safekeeping, privacy, care, protection, and welfare of prisoners.

In developing the standards and any amendments thereto, the Secretary shall consult with organizations representing local government and local law enforcement, including the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, the North Carolina League of Municipalities, the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association, and the North Carolina Police Executives’ Association. The Secretary shall also consult with interested State departments and agencies, including the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Insurance, and the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission, and the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission.

Before the standards or any amendments thereto may become effective, they must be approved by the Commission and the Governor. Upon becoming effective, they have the force and effect of law.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, each dormitory in a county detention facility may house up to 64 inmates as long as the dormitory provides all of the following:

A minimum floor space of 70 square feet per inmate, including both the sleeping and dayroom areas.

One shower per eight inmates, one toilet per eight inmates, one sink with a security mirror per eight inmates, and one water fountain.

A telephone jack or other telephone arrangement provided within the dormitory.

Space designed to allow a variety of activities.

Sufficient seating and tables for all inmates.

A way for officers to observe the entire area from the entrance.

A local confinement facility shall be subject to the requirements of Part 2B of Article 10 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes.

History.

1967, c. 581, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, ss. 128, 133, 138; c. 822, s. 1; 1983, c. 745, s. 6; c. 768, s. 20; 1991, c. 237, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2008-194, s. 10(a), (b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2011-324, s. 1; 2014-22, s. 1; 2017-186, s. 2(eeeeeeeee); 2019-76, s. 30; 2021-143, s. 3(b); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section effective until amended January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-221

.

Cross References.

As to detention of juveniles in holdover facilities meeting the minimum standards of this section where no juvenile detention home is available, see

G.S. 7B-505

, 7B-1905.

As to exception for contracts for the purchase of food and supplies for county detention facilities by the sheriffs of certain counties, see

G.S. 143-131.1

.

Use of Closed Facilites.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 16C.1(a), (b), provides: “(a) In conjunction with the closing of prison facilities, youth detention centers, and youth development centers, the Department of Public Safety shall consult with the county or municipality in which the facility is located, with elected State and local officials, and with State and federal agencies about the possibility of converting that facility to other use. The Department may also consult with any private for-profit or nonprofit firm about the possibility of converting the facility to other use. In developing a proposal for future use of each facility, the Department shall give priority to converting the facility to other criminal justice use. Consistent with existing law and the future needs of the Department of Public Safety, the State may provide for the transfer or the lease of any of these facilities to counties, municipalities, State agencies, federal agencies, or private firms wishing to convert them to other use.
G.S. 146-29.1(f) through (g) shall not apply to a transfer made pursuant to this section. The Department of Public Safety may also consider converting some of the facilities recommended for closing from one security custody level to another, where that conversion would be cost-effective. A prison unit under lease to a county pursuant to the provisions of this section for use as a jail is exempt for the period of the lease from any of the minimum standards adopted by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

for the housing of adult prisoners that would subject the unit to greater standards than those required of a unit of the State prison system.

“(b) The Department may convert closed facilities for the following purposes:

“(1) Training needs.

“(2) Behavior modification facilities.

“(3) Transitional housing.

“Sixty days prior to converting facilities to these purposes, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety. The report shall include the justification for the conversion, operational requirements for the facility, and available resources for staffing and operating the facility. If the proposed facility will require additional funding in the future, the report shall provide a five-year projection of those funding needs.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2003-284, s. 16.5, Session Laws
2005-276, s. 17.5, Session Laws
2007-323, s. 17.7, Session Laws
2009-451, s. 19.4(a) and (b), Session Laws
2011-145, s. 18.3, Session Laws
2013-360, s. 16A.3, as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 16C.10, and Session Laws
2015-241, s. 16C.3.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 16A.3, as amended by Session Laws
2014-100, s. 16C.10, provides: “In conjunction with the closing of prison facilities, youth detention centers, and youth development centers, the Department of Public Safety shall consult with the county or municipality in which the facility is located, with the elected State and local officials, and with State and federal agencies about the possibility of converting that facility to other use. The Department may also consult with any private for-profit or nonprofit firm about the possibility of converting the facility to other use. In developing a proposal for future use of each facility, the Department shall give priority to converting the facility to other criminal justice use. Consistent with existing law and the future needs of the Department of Public Safety, the State may provide for the transfer or the lease of any of these facilities to counties, municipalities, State agencies, federal agencies, or private firms wishing to convert them to other use. The Department of Public Safety may also consider converting some of the facilities recommended for closing from one security custody level to another, where that conversion would be cost-effective. A prison unit under lease to a county pursuant to the provisions of this section for use as a jail is exempt for the period of the lease from any of the minimum standards adopted by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

for the housing of adult prisoners that would subject the unit to greater standards than those required of a unit of the State prison system.

“In addition, the Department of Public Safety may use available funds to reopen and convert closed facilities for use as treatment and behavior modification facilities for offenders serving a period of confinement in response to violation pursuant to
G.S. 15A-1344(d2).”

§ 153A-221.1.
Standards and inspections. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The legal responsibility of the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for State services to county juvenile detention homes under this Article is hereby confirmed and shall include the following: development of State standards under the prescribed procedures; inspection; consultation; technical assistance; and training.

The Secretary of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the Secretary of Public Safety, shall also develop standards under which a local jail may be approved as a holdover facility for not more than five calendar days pending placement in a juvenile detention home which meets State standards, providing the local jail is so arranged that any child placed in the holdover facility cannot converse with, see, or be seen by the adult population of the jail while in the holdover facility. The personnel responsible for the administration of a jail with an approved holdover facility shall provide close supervision of any child placed in the holdover facility for the protection of the child.

History.

1973, c. 1230, s. 2; c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 426, s. 2; 1983, c. 768, s. 21; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 13(nn); 1999-423, s. 12; 2000-137, s. 4(hh); 2012-172, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 16D.7(c); 2017-186, s. 2(fffffffff).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-221.1

.

Cross References.

As to exception for contracts for the purchase of food and supplies for county detention facilities by the sheriffs of certain counties, see

G.S. 143-131.1

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(fffffffff), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction” for “Division of” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice” for “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the first paragraph. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 153A-221.1.
Standards and inspections. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The legal responsibility of the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for State services to county juvenile detention homes under this Article is hereby confirmed and shall include the following: development of State standards under the prescribed procedures; inspection; consultation; technical assistance; and training.

The Secretary of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the Secretary of Public Safety, shall also develop standards under which a local jail may be approved as a holdover facility for not more than five calendar days pending placement in a juvenile detention home which meets State standards, providing the local jail is so arranged that any child placed in the holdover facility cannot converse with, see, or be seen by the adult population of the jail while in the holdover facility. The personnel responsible for the administration of a jail with an approved holdover facility shall provide close supervision of any child placed in the holdover facility for the protection of the child.

History.

1973, c. 1230, s. 2; c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 426, s. 2; 1983, c. 768, s. 21; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 13(nn); 1999-423, s. 12; 2000-137, s. 4(hh); 2012-172, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 16D.7(c); 2017-186, s. 2(fffffffff); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-221.1

.

Cross References.

As to exception for contracts for the purchase of food and supplies for county detention facilities by the sheriffs of certain counties, see

G.S. 143-131.1

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(fffffffff), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction” for “Division of” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice” for “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the first paragraph. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 153A-222.
Inspections of local confinement facilities.

Department personnel shall visit and inspect each local confinement facility at least semiannually. The purpose of the inspections is to investigate the conditions of confinement, the treatment of prisoners, the maintenance of entry level employment standards for jailers and supervisory and administrative personnel of local confinement facilities as provided for in

G.S. 153A-216(4)

, and to determine whether the facilities meet the minimum standards published pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

. The inspector shall make a written report of each inspection and submit it within 30 days after the day the inspection is completed to the governing body and other local officials responsible for the facility. The report shall specify each way in which the facility does not meet the minimum standards. The governing body shall consider the report at its first regular meeting after receipt of the report and shall promptly initiate any action necessary to bring the facility into conformity with the standards. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 8-53

or any other provision of law relating to the confidentiality of communications between physician and patient, the representatives of the Department of Health and Human Services who make these inspections may review any writing or other record in any recording medium which pertains to the admission, discharge, medication, treatment, medical condition, or history of persons who are or have been inmates of the facility being inspected. Physicians, psychologists, psychiatrists, nurses, and anyone else involved in giving treatment at or through a facility who may be interviewed by representatives of the Department may disclose to these representatives information related to an inquiry, notwithstanding the existence of the physician-patient privilege in

G.S. 8-53

or any other rule of law; provided the patient, resident or client has not made written objection to such disclosure. The facility, its employees, and any person interviewed during these inspections shall be immune from liability for damages resulting from the disclosure of any information to the Department. Any confidential or privileged information received from review of records or interviews shall be kept confidential by the Department and not disclosed without written authorization of the inmate or legal representative, or unless disclosure is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. The Department shall institute appropriate policies and procedures to ensure that this information shall not be disclosed without authorization or court order. The Department shall not disclose the name of anyone who has furnished information concerning a facility without the consent of that person. Neither the names of persons furnishing information nor any confidential or privileged information obtained from records or interviews shall be considered “public records” within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

. Prior to releasing any information or allowing any inspections referred to in this section the patient, resident or client must be advised in writing that he has the right to object in writing to such release of information or review of his records and that by an objection in writing he may prohibit the inspection or release of his records.

History.

1947, c. 915; 1967, c. 581, s. 2; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1981, c. 586, s. 6; 1983, c. 745, s. 7; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

Cross References.

As to detention of juveniles in holdover facilities inspected pursuant to

G.S. 131D-11

through 131D-13 and this section where no juvenile detention home is available, see now

G.S. 7B-505

, 7B-1905.